Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-213
Money; power to borrow.

A city of the first class may borrow money on the credit of the city and pledge the credit, revenue, and public property of the city for the payment thereof when authorized in the manner provided by law.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XVII, p. 249;

R.S.1913, § 4829;

C.S.1922, § 3997;

C.S.1929, § 16-214;

R.S.1943, § 16-213;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 21.